Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-455
Appeals.

Any party to a decision of the department under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act may appeal such decision. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 55.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.